Arkansas, session 2025, SB208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-9-109 is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(g)(1) A canvasser who witnesses signatures on a petition part shall
view a copy of a potential petitioner's photo identification to verify the
identity of the potential petitioner before obtaining the signature.
(2) If a canvasser cannot verify the identity of the potential
petitioner, the canvasser shall not obtain a signature from the potential
petitioner.
(3) A canvasser who submits a canvasser affidavit under
subsection (a) of this section swearing that to the best of the affiant's
knowledge and belief each signature is genuine, and that the person signing
is a legal voter, but does not comply with the requirements under subdivision
(g)(1) of this section makes a false statement on a petition verification
*SSS086*
02-19-2025 11:09:14 SSS086

As Engrossed: H2/19/25 SB208
form.
(4) As used in this subsection, "photo identification" means a
document or identification card permitted under § 7-1-101(40).

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act
are declared to be severable and the invalidity of any provision of this act
shall not affect other provisions of the act which can be given effect
without the invalid provision.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and
determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the process
for citizens to propose initiated acts and amendments to the Arkansas
Constitution is critical to a well-functioning democracy in this state; that
it is of the utmost importance that the integrity of the initiative process
be strengthened through this act so that petitioners and voters maintain a
high degree of confidence in the soundness of their right to legislate as
citizens of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary because any
delay in the implementation of this act would disrupt the initiative process
for the 2026 general election, which would have a detrimental effect on the
public peace, health, and safety of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/K. Hammer





02-19-2025 11:09:14 SSS086